Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2525
Occupational therapy aide; supervision requirements.

An occupational therapy aide shall function under the guidance and responsibility of an occupational therapist and may be supervised by an occupational therapist or an occupational therapy assistant for specifically selected routine tasks for which the aide has been trained and has demonstrated competence. The aide shall comply with supervision requirements developed by the board. The board shall develop supervision requirements for aides which are consistent with prevailing professional standards.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 123;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6117;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 865.